South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S500.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - Office of Elevators and Amusement Rides, relating to Office of Elevators and Amusement Rides, designated as Regulation Document Number 5353, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation, Office of Elevators and Amusement Rides, proposes to amend its regulations, appearing in Chapter 71 of the South Carolina Code of Regulations, following a comprehensive review conducted pursuant to S.C. Code Section 1-23-120(J). A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on May 24, 2024. ----XX----